Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2031.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Willcox active management area; certificate of grandfathered right; time extension; delayed repeal A. Notwithstanding section 45-476, subsection A, Arizona Revised Statutes, a person claiming the right to withdraw or receive and use groundwater in the Willcox active management area pursuant to a grandfathered right shall file an application for a certificate of grandfathered right with the department of water resources not later than twenty-seven months after the date of the designation of the active management area on a form provided by the department. B. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2026. Sec. 2. Retroactivity This act applies retroactively to from and after January 7, 2025. (ENACTED WITHOUT THE EMERGENCY) Sec. 3. Emergency This act is an emergency measure that is necessary to preserve the public peace, health or safety and is operative immediately as provided by law.